test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-cuadaad_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čuáđáád: #
    čuá´đáád+N+Sg+Nom: čuáđáád
    čuá´đáád+N+Sg+Gen: čuáđáád
    čuá´đáád+N+Sg+Acc: čuáđáád
    čuá´đáád+N+Sg+Ill: čuá´đádân
    čuá´đáád+N+Sg+Loc: čuá´đádist
    čuá´đáád+N+Sg+Com: čuá´đádáin
    čuá´đáád+N+Sg+Abe: čuáđáádttáá
    čuá´đáád+N+Ess: čuá´đádin
    čuá´đáád+N+Par: čuá´đádid
    čuá´đáád+N+Pl+Nom: čuá'đádeh
    čuá´đáád+N+Pl+Gen: čuá'đádij
    čuá´đáád+N+Pl+Acc: čuá´đádijd
    čuá´đáád+N+Pl+Ill: čuá´đádáid
    čuá´đáád+N+Pl+Loc: čuá´đádijn
    čuá´đáád+N+Pl+Com: čuá´đádijguin
    čuá´đáád+N+Pl+Abe: čuá´đádijttáá
